Utah statutes.
62A-2-117.5.   Foster care by a child's relative.

(1)  In accordance with state and federal law, the division shall provide for licensure of a child's relative for foster or substitute care, when the child is in the temporary custody or custody of the Division of Child and Family Services.  If it is determined that, under federal law, allowance is made for an approval process requiring less than full foster parent licensure proceedings for a child's relative, the division shall establish an approval process to accomplish that purpose.

(2)  For purposes of this section:

(a)  "Custody" and "temporary custody" mean the same as those terms are defined in Section 62A-4a-101.

(b)  "Relative" means the same as that term is defined in Section 78A-6-307.

